Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 201616-326
Elective officers; compensation; change during term prohibited; exception.

The salary of any elective officer shall not be increased or diminished during the term for which he or she was elected, except that when there are officers elected to the city council, or to a board or commission having more than one member and the terms of one or more members commence and end at different times, the compensation of all members of such city council, board, or commission may be increased or diminished at the beginning of the full term of any member thereof. No person who shall have resigned or vacated any office shall be eligible to the same during the time for which he or she was elected when, during the same time, the salary has been increased.

Laws 1901, c. 18, § 32, p. 238;

R.S.1913, § 4892;

C.S.1922, § 4060;

C.S.1929, § 16-322;

R.S.1943, § 16-326;

Laws 1969, c. 75, § 2, p. 404;

Laws 1972, LB 943, § 1;

Laws 2016, LB704, § 68.
July 21, 2016
Member of board of public works cannot contract with city or village for additional salary as manager of public utilities. Neisius v. Henry, 142 Neb. 29, 5 N.W.2d 291 (1942).